Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 5. Population Data.

§ 24.2-314.
Population data; reallocation of prison populations.

Persons incarcerated in federal correctional facilities and in state and local correctional facilities, as those terms are defined in §

53.1-1

, shall be counted and reallocated for redistricting and reapportionment purposes in accordance with the provisions of this section and the following:

A person incarcerated in a federal, state, or local correctional facility whose address at the time of incarceration was located within the Commonwealth shall be deemed to reside at such address.

A person incarcerated in a federal, state, or local correctional facility whose address at the time of incarceration was located outside of the Commonwealth or whose address at the time of incarceration cannot be determined shall be deemed to reside at the location of the facility in which he is incarcerated.

By July 1 of any year in which the decennial census is taken, the Department of Corrections and the State Board of Local and Regional Jails shall provide to the Division of Legislative Services, in a format specified by the Division of Legislative Services, the following information for each person who was incarcerated in a state or local correctional facility on April 1 of that year:

A unique identifier, other than his name or offender identification number, assigned by the Department of Corrections or the State Board of Local and Regional Jails for this purpose;

His residential street address at the time of incarceration, or other legal residence, if known;

His race, his ethnicity as identified by him, and whether he is 18 years of age or older; and

The street address of the correctional facility in which he was incarcerated on April 1 of that year.

The Division of Legislative Services shall request each agency operating a federal correctional facility in the Commonwealth that incarcerates persons convicted of a criminal offense to provide to the Division of Legislative Services by July 1 of any year in which the decennial census is taken a record containing the information specified in subsection B for each person who was incarcerated in the facility on April 1 of that year. Any person incarcerated in a federal correctional facility for whom a record is not received by the Division of Legislative Services shall be deemed to have an address at the time of incarceration that cannot be determined.

The Division of Legislative Services shall prepare adjusted population data, including race and ethnicity data, in a manner that reflects the inclusion of incarcerated persons in the population count of the locality in which he is deemed to reside pursuant to subdivision A 1 or 2.This adjusted population data shall be used for purposes of redistricting and reapportionment and shall be the basis for congressional, state Senate, House of Delegates, and local government election districts. This adjusted population data shall not be used in the distribution of any federal or state aid.

The Division of Legislative Services shall make the adjusted population data available no later than 30 days following receipt of population data from the United States Bureau of the Census pursuant to P.L. 94-171. In making this data available, the Division of Legislative Services shall ensure no information regarding a specific incarcerated person’s address at the time of incarceration is made public.

History.

2020, cc. 759, 1229, 1265.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 759, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Board of Local and Regional Jails, formerly known as the State Board of Corrections, is continued, and wherever ‘State Board of Corrections’ is used in the Code of Virginia, it shall mean the State Board of Local and Regional Jails.” At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “State Board of Local and Regional Jails” was substituted for “Board of Corrections” in subsection B and subdivision B 1.

Acts 2020, cc. 1229 and 1265, cl. 2 provides: “That, notwithstanding the deadlines set forth in §§

24.2-314

and

53.1-5.2

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and in §

53.1-10

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, the Board of Corrections shall direct the sheriffs of all local jails and the jail superintendents of all regional jails to provide to it the information required pursuant to § 53.1 -5.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, by August 1, 2020; the Department of Corrections and the Board of Corrections shall provide to the Division of Legislative Services the information required pursuant to §

24.2-314

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, by September 1, 2020; and the Division of Legislative Services shall require each agency operating a federal correctional facility in the Commonwealth to provide to it the information specified in § 24.2-314 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, by September 1, 2020.”